Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1597
Transuranic waste, defined.

Transuranic waste shall mean radioactive waste containing alpha emitting transuranic elements at levels determined by the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission to be transuranic waste.

Laws 1986, LB 491, § 20.